District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.15

Closing of alley upon erection of building covering two-thirds of square

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 714, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-301 to 7-308.